Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 8 Construction and Maintenance of State Roads

24-8-1.
Annual report and recommendations — Roads on which expenditures made — Contracts.

The director of transportation shall annually make a report to the general assembly, during the month of January, setting forth in detail all its transactions during the preceding year and making such recommendations for improving the main highways of the state as the director shall deem necessary for the best interests of the entire state, having regard also to the connection of the main highways with the main highways of the adjoining states. No work, other than preliminary surveys, shall be done upon any of the main highways previous to the time that the main highways are made a part of the state highway system and money appropriated for their improvement. The director shall direct and control, according to law, the expenditure of all appropriations and upon the director’s request the department of administration is hereby authorized to make all contracts necessary for that purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 982, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 84, § 3; P.L. 1920, ch. 1877, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 3; P.L. 1931, ch. 1772, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-1

; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 69.

24-8-1.1.
Rhode Island highway system — Purpose.

The purpose of §§

24-8-1.1

—

24-8-1.7

is to establish a pavement management program to better maintain the state’s highways in a safe and serviceable condition. In order to fairly distribute funds for a pavement management program, an equitable system to determine jurisdiction on highways is needed. The principles of highway functional classification, or the importance of roads in terms of the type of travel service provided, shall be used to determine jurisdiction. Roads serving longer-distance travel, connecting city and town centers and major traffic generators shall be the state’s responsibility. Roads serving local travel shall be under city or town jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 4.

24-8-1.2.
Rhode Island highway system — Establishment.

There is hereby established a Rhode Island highway system which shall include state roads and municipal roads. The determination of those roads designated as state roads and those designated as municipal roads shall be based upon a functional classification system, as established by the state planning council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 4.

24-8-1.3.
Definitions.

“Arterial” means a public road that provides a high level of travel services for a long, uninterrupted distance.

“Major collector” means a public road that provides a service to built up areas of towns and traffic generators of regional importance and not directly served by arterials.

“Municipal roads” means any public road not designated as a state road either under the statute or under the functional classification guidelines.

“Pavement management program” includes resurfacing, striping and signing; minor drainage improvements, minor guardrail improvements, crack sealing, chip sealing, retaining wall repair, sidewalk and curb repair. The program shall also include educational activities, training programs, research grants, and such technical assistance as can be provided by maximizing the use of state education resources.

“Rhode Island highway system” means all public roads including both state roads and municipal roads.

“Rural” means an area not included in the boundary of an urban area.

“State roads” means all public roads classified as arterials and major collectors, except urban minor arterials located in the eight (8) cities of Central Falls, Cranston, East Providence, Newport, Pawtucket, Providence, Warwick, and Woonsocket.

“Urban” means an area so designated for purposes of highway functional classification, based on criteria as established by the U.S. Bureau of the Census.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 4.

24-8-1.4.
Annual report and recommendations — Roads on which expenditures made — Contracts.

The director of transportation shall annually make a report to the general assembly, during the month of January, setting forth in detail all the department’s transactions during the preceding year, and making such recommendations for improving the Rhode Island highway system, as the director shall deem necessary, in the best interest of the state, having regard also for the connection of the system with the main highways of the adjoining states.

The director of transportation shall direct and control, according to law, the expenditure of all appropriations for improvement and upon the director’s request, the department of administration is hereby authorized to make all contracts necessary for that purpose. Any work in reference to state roads must be approved by the director of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 4.

24-8-1.5.
Turnback implementation plan.

The director of transportation shall prepare and carry out a plan regarding an implementation schedule for all roads changing jurisdiction as a result of this section. Any road that changes jurisdiction and becomes a municipal road, under the enactment of this section, that such shall be repaired and improved, as may be deemed necessary, by the department of transportation to a safe and usable condition before the road is returned to the jurisdiction of the municipality; provided, however that no road shall be returned to the jurisdiction of a municipality without its consent if the jurisdiction does not have a full-time highway department; and provided further that in the town of Portsmouth to preserve the coastal right-of-way for highway purposes, Park Avenue, Point Road, and Hummock Avenue including the “Cove Bridge” shall not be returned to the jurisdiction of the town of Portsmouth and shall remain the responsibility of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 4; P.L. 1989, ch. 459, § 1.

24-8-1.6.
Review.

The initial review of the functional classification system for jurisdictional purposes shall be completed by May 15, 1988. A review of this functional classification system shall take place every ten (10) years. The review shall come under the supervision and authority of the state planning council. Any amendment made to the functional classification system within the ten (10) year period, shall not change the jurisdictional responsibilities for maintenance of those roads affected by the modification.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 4.

24-8-1.7.
Rules and regulations.

The director of transportation is hereby authorized to adopt and enforce such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and §

43-3-17

, to establish and adopt a pavement management program, and to enforce the provisions thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 4.

24-8-2, 24-8-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 982, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 84, § 4; P.L. 1912, ch. 799, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 4; P.L. 1927, ch. 987, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2269, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 4; G.L. 1956, §§

24-8-2

, 24-8-3; Repealed by P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 5, effective July 1, 1988.

24-8-4.
Improvement, reconstruction, or widening of roads — Widening at town expense.

The director of transportation shall have the power and authority to improve, rebuild, and reconstruct any existing state highway in accordance with this section, if the improvement, rebuilding, and reconstruction will facilitate the free and easy movement of vehicle traffic and help to increase the safety of the state highways. The director of transportation in carrying out all the construction and improvement shall avoid as far as possible the creation of sharp angles, turns or grades. Any city or town desiring to have a highway constructed or improved to a greater width than the width determined upon by the director of transportation may agree in writing with the director of transportation for such additional width as the city or town may desire; provided, the entire expense of the additional width shall be paid by the city or town to the general treasurer, and be credited to the amount available for use by the director of transportation for the purpose of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 982, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 84, § 4; P.L. 1912, ch. 799, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 4; P.L. 1927, ch. 987, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2269, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, §§ 4, 28; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-4

; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 69.

24-8-4.1.
Highway workers.

All persons working on any public way in this state shall be required to wear distinctly visible clothing of a type approved by the director of the department of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 68, § 1.

24-8-4.2.
Use of truck mounted attenuator.

At any and all times during which construction and/or maintenance work is being undertaken on any state highway and/or interstate connector, under the terms of either the highway or bridge contract in which an attenuator truck is required under federal and/or Rhode Island department of transportation guidelines, no attenuator truck shall be left unattended while work is actively being performed. Further, at all times while that work is actively being performed, an attenuator truck shall be deployed on the worksite. A minimum of one attenuator truck shall be equipped with a first-aid kit and two (2) fire extinguishers. The operator of the attenuator truck shall have completed appropriate training and be certified in both first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR). A copy of both first aid and CPR certifications shall be kept with the truck driver.

The penalty for failure to comply with this section shall be as set forth in §

31-27-22

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 355, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 457, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 472, § 1.

24-8-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 26, as enacted by P.L. 1931, ch. 1772, § 2; P.L. 1938, ch. 2576, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 23; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 60, § 100; G.L. 1956, §§

24-8-5

; Repealed by P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 5, effective July 1, 1988.

24-8-6.
Authority for sidewalks and curbs.

The director of transportation shall have the power and authority to make, lay in and upon, and construct sidewalks, including curbs, adjacent to and along either or any one side or both sides of any state road, now constructed, in the process of construction, or to be constructed, which in his or her opinion and judgment require sidewalks and curbs for pedestrian travel.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 27; P.L. 1935, ch. 2269, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-6

; P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 6.

24-8-7.
Specifications for curbs and sidewalks.

Whenever and wherever the director of transportation shall order and cause the building and construction of curbs and sidewalks as provided in this chapter, the curb shall be made and constructed of a suitable and hard material. The curb shall be set and shall not project above the edge of the highway more than twelve inches (12") nor less than four inches (4"). The width of the curb at the top shall not be more than twelve inches (12") and not less than four inches (4"). The sidewalk shall be made and constructed of a suitable and hard material with a smooth hard finished surface or face. Whenever and wherever feasible and practical, the surface or face of the sidewalk shall be set and laid flush with the top of the curb and shall not be less than four feet (4´) wide from the inside top edge of the curb.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 28; P.L. 1935, ch. 2269, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-7

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 59.

24-8-8.
Space between curb and traveled highway.

The director of transportation whenever and wherever laying out the plans and drawing up the specifications for the building and construction of curbs and sidewalks, as provided in this chapter, shall, whenever and wherever feasible and practical, cause and order the curb to be placed and set back from the outside paved or metal edge of the state road not less than eight feet (8´). The intervening part of the road between the outside paved or metal edge of the road and the curb shall be brought up to the proper grade and line of the road and shall have a continuous smooth surface so that the road shall have a continuous smooth surface from the center line of the road to the face of the curb. Whenever and wherever the director of transportation decides that in his or her opinion and judgment on certain roads and portions of certain roads it is not feasible and practical to build and construct the curb placed and set back not less than eight feet (8´) from the outside paved or metal edge of the roads as provided in this chapter, the director of transportation shall cause and order the curb placed and set against the outside paved or metal edge of the roads; provided, the adjacent outside lane of vehicle travel of the paved or metal portion of the road is not less than twelve feet (12´) in width where feasible and practicable.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 29; P.L. 1935, ch. 2269, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-8

; P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 59.

24-8-9.
Regulations of sidewalks and curbs.

The director of transportation shall have the power and authority to alter, to maintain, to keep in good condition, to remove ice and snow therefrom, to remove posts, steps and any other obstructions therein, to regulate the placement, structure, and alteration of curbs constructed adjacent to state roads, to regulate the height, size, and shape of awnings, signs, and any other structures which project over all curbs and all sidewalks now constructed, in the process of construction or to be constructed on state roads; except, on portion or portions of state roads in cities or towns where the territory contiguous thereto is closely built up.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 30; P.L. 1935, ch. 2269, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-9

; P.L. 1983, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 6.

24-8-10.
Improvement or reconstruction of railroad crossings.

The director of transportation shall have the power and authority to improve with automatic protection devices or by relocating or rebuilding existing highway-railroad crossings at grade, or by reconstructing existing railroad and highway separation structures, if the improvements, rebuilding, or reconstruction will increase the safety of the crossings and highway, or may eliminate the crossings at grade by the adjustment of track and highway levels and by the construction of separation structures and connecting roadways suitably located to serve all affected properties, and by closing the highways at existing crossings so served, subject to approval of the railroad authorities and the public utilities and carriers administration as provided in chapters 1 — 9 of title 39. For railroad-highway crossings not on the state highway system, the improvements, construction, reconstruction, or closing shall also be subject to the approval of the town or city in which the work is to be performed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 29; P.L. 1949, ch. 2340, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-10

.

24-8-11.
Beautification.

The department of transportation is hereby authorized and empowered to plant trees, shrubs and otherwise beautify the area within the limits of a road in a manner and at locations as the department may deem advisable, and the cost of the work shall be paid from moneys, appropriated for highway purposes, not otherwise needed for the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of state roads and bridges; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sums as may from time to time be required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the director of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1557, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 78, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 65, 100; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-11

; P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 6.

24-8-12.
Contracts — Advertising for bids.

All road construction or improvements made by the director of transportation shall be, and all repairs may be, performed by written contract, made by the department of administration in behalf of the state, and after advertisement, by order of the department of administration has been published at least once in a newspaper of statewide circulation and at least five (5) calendar days before the final date of submitting bids, inviting sealed proposals for the road construction or improvement, to be made under the supervision and subject to the approval of the department of administration, and in accordance with the plans and specifications of the department of transportation; and the advertisement shall state the time and place the plans and specifications may be examined, and when the proposals made in answer to the advertisement will be opened, and shall reserve the right of the department of administration to reject any and all proposals.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 982, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 84, § 5; P.L. 1913, ch. 925, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-12

; P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 6.

24-8-13.
Contractors’ bond — Forfeiture.

The person whose proposal or bid is accepted by the department of administration, shall be required to give bond, in a sum not less than fifty percent (50%) of the contract price, to indemnify the town or city where the road lies against damage while the road is being constructed or improved, and the state shall not be liable for any damage occasioned thereby; and every contract made for the construction or improvement shall provide for a forfeiture of such sum or sums as the department may deem proper, for failure to complete, according to contract, the road construction or improvement within the specified time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 982, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 84, § 6; P.L. 1920, ch. 1877, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-13

.

24-8-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 982, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 84, § 6; P.L. 1920, ch. 1877, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-14

; Repealed by P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 5, effective July 1, 1988.

24-8-15.
Snow and ice removal — Notice of defects.

Every town or city shall at its own expense keep state roads within its limits, respectively, sufficiently clear of snow and ice so the roads shall be reasonably safe for travel as now required by law, and shall at once notify in writing the director of transportation or his or her employees of any defect or want of repair of state roads within its limits.

All storage piles or areas where road de-icing agents are stored within the Scituate watershed shall be adequately covered and stored on an impervious base to mitigate runoff impacts to ground and surface waters. The director of the department of transportation shall ensure where funds allow, that all drivers, loaders and handlers of de-icing agents within any watershed participate in training sessions in the proper application and control of road de-icing agents; that de-icing vehicles, wherever feasible, operating within the Scituate watershed area equipped with sensor devices to control the spread rate of de-icing materials in relation to the speed of the vehicle.

For purposes of this section the “Scituate watershed” shall mean the total drainage area into the Scituate Reservoir — an area of some 92.8 square miles in the towns of Scituate, Johnston, Foster, Glocester, and Smithfield — which because of its topography, soil type, and drainage patterns acts as a collector of rain waters which replenish or regorge existing public drinking water supplies in the Scituate Reservoir.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 982, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 84, § 6; P.L. 1920, ch. 1877, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-15

; P.L. 1990, ch. 472, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 59; P.L. 2005, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 32.

24-8-16.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1904, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 9; P.L. 1928, ch. 1169, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 9; P.L. 1947, ch. 1960, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3320, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-16

; P.L. 1958, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 1959, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 6; Repealed by P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

24-8-17.
Determination and payment of appropriations to the state, cities, and towns.

The amounts which the state, cities, and towns shall receive from the appropriations provided for in this chapter, shall annually be determined by the state controller upon filing by the director of transportation of a report setting forth the number of miles of roads within the state and within each city and town which are functionally classified as: principal arterials, minor arterials, major collectors, minor collectors, and urban collectors, and within each city and town of the total number of motor vehicle registrations. The state controller is hereby authorized and directed, upon receipt by him or her of the report as provided in this section, to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer in favor of the respective state budget officer for the payment of such sums, as may from time to time be required, or become due to the respective state, city, or town under the provisions of this chapter. Nothing in this section shall affect the federal aid transportation program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1904, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-17

; P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 59.

24-8-18.
Use of sums appropriated — Annual report.

The sums paid to the state, cities, or towns under the provisions of this chapter shall be used exclusively within the state, and within the cities and towns for those roads listed under §

24-8-17

. The sums shall only be spent for maintenance and repair. Except up to twenty-five percent (25%) of each city or town’s allotment is eligible for expenditure on any highway pavement management need. Each and every year after the initial year of this program, in order to obtain payment under this title, the state and each city or town must first receive approval for the expenditures by the director of transportation. The city or town treasurer, or state budget officer shall on or before May 30th of each year, certify in writing to the director of transportation how the sums have been expended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1904, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 10; P.L. 1923, ch. 474, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-18

; P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 6; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 69.

24-8-19.
Designation and maintenance of detours.

Whenever it is necessary for the purpose of constructing, reconstructing, or repairing state roads to close such roads to the traveling public, the department of transportation shall provide suitable detours, and when roads other than state roads are designated by the department of transportation as detours, then the other roads shall be maintained in reasonably good condition by the department of transportation during their use as detours, and for the purpose of providing and maintaining the detours, may expend in the aggregate from appropriations available for the construction, reconstruction or repair, a sum not exceeding thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) annually and the state controller is hereby directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of so much thereof as may be from time to time required upon receipt of properly authenticated vouchers.

The designation and use as a detour of any road other than a state road, and the maintenance of another road so used shall in no way be construed as acceptance as a state road, and the other road shall not come under the supervision of the department of transportation except for use as a detour as provided in this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 84, § 10; P.L. 1919, ch. 1777, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 8; P.L. 1928, ch. 1147, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 65, 100; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-19

.

24-8-20.
Location of fuel pumps adjacent to highway.

No owner or other persons shall hereafter locate a pump as defined in §

31-36-1

, or a pump to be used to distribute lubricating oils or any attachments thereof within ten feet (10´) of the boundary line of a state road without first obtaining the permission of the department of transportation. The department shall determine applications for permission upon the basis of public safety and may impose upon permits granted reasonable conditions to insure public safety.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 15; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 30; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; redesignated § 31 by P.L. 1949, ch. 2340, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-20

; P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 6.

24-8-21.
Jurisdiction of bridges on state highways.

All bridges lying in any highway or highways which have been constructed by or upon which work has been done by the state under the supervision of the state board of public roads shall hereafter come under the supervision of the director of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 846, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-21

.

24-8-22.
Examination and repair or construction of bridges.

The director of transportation shall make an examination of all state bridges, and shall determine which of the bridges shall be constructed, repaired or reconstructed, and contracts shall be placed in the manner prescribed by §

24-8-12

for the construction, reparation or reconstruction of the bridges; and the expense of the construction, reparation or reconstruction shall be paid by the state from funds available for this purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 846, § 2; P.L. 1919, ch. 1765, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 261; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-22

.

24-8-23.
Cost of construction or repair of bridges used by public utilities.

Upon the completion of the construction, reparation or reconstruction of any of the bridges, used by any public utility, the director of transportation shall file a full and detailed statement setting forth the amount expended in the construction, reparation or reconstruction of each bridge used by any public utility, with the public utility administrator, and a copy of the statement shall be filed in the treasurer’s office of the public utility. The public utility administrator, shall immediately set a time for hearing and shall, after notice of the hearing to the public utility and to the department of transportation, determine what amount, if any, of the expense of the construction, reparation or reconstruction of the bridge or bridges shall be paid by the public utility upon the basis and in the manner provided in §

39-2-6

.

If any payment, determined to be due from any public utility shall not be paid to the state within one year from the date of the determination by the public utility administrator of the amount due from any public utility, the state shall be entitled to recover the amount due in an action of debt, together with interest from six (6) months from the date of the determination by the public utility administrator, at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum, and upon securing judgment against any public utility, execution shall issue against the property of the public utility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 846, § 3; P.L. 1919, ch. 1765, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 14; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 123; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-23

.

24-8-24.
Bridges incorporated into state system — Responsibility for maintenance.

All bridges so repaired, constructed, or reconstructed pursuant to the provisions set forth in this chapter shall, upon the completion of the construction, reparation or reconstruction, be and become a part of the state highway system, and shall henceforth be repaired, maintained, and reconstructed by the state under the supervision of the director of transportation, except that where any of the bridges are used by any public utility, then the public utility shall pay in the manner provided by §

24-8-23

toward the maintenance, reparation, and reconstruction of the bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 846, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-24

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 59.

24-8-25.
Bringing new bridges into state system.

Any bridge lying in any highway or highways which have been constructed by or upon which work has been done by the state under the supervision of the director of transportation, which shall not be constructed, repaired, or reconstructed by the director of transportation before the making of the director’s next annual report, may be included in the director’s next or any subsequent annual report and recommended for construction, reparation, or reconstruction, and the general assembly may appropriate money for the construction, reparation, or reconstruction. And whenever hereafter the director of transportation shall recommend the relocating, regrading, or improving of any highway which shall include any bridge, the bridge shall come under the supervision of the director of transportation, and the legislature shall, upon appropriating money for the relocating, regrading, or improving of the highway, also make a specific appropriation for the construction, reparation, or reconstruction of the bridge according to the recommendations of the director of transportation, except that each public utility using any of the bridges shall repay to the state the portion of the cost of construction, reparation, or reconstruction of the bridges to be determined in such manner as is provided by §

24-8-23

. The bridges when so constructed, repaired, or reconstructed shall thereupon become a part of the state highway system, and shall henceforth be maintained by the state, except those bridges which are used by any public utility which shall pay a part of the cost of maintenance of the bridges in the manner provided by §

24-8-23

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 846, § 7; P.L. 1919, ch. 1765, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-25

.

24-8-26.
Removal of snow and ice from bridges — Notice of defects.

Every town or city in which any bridge is located, which shall be maintained by the state under the provisions of this chapter, shall at its own expense keep the bridge within its limits sufficiently clear of snow and ice so that the bridge shall be reasonably safe for traveling, and shall at once notify in writing the director of transportation or the director’s employees of any defect or want of repair in the bridge. The director of transportation shall upon the receipt of the information notify any public utility using the bridge of the defect or want of repair.

All storage piles or areas where road de-icing agents are stored within the Scituate watershed shall be adequately covered and stored on an impervious base to mitigate runoff impacts to ground and surface waters. The director of the department of transportation shall ensure where funds allow, that all drivers, loaders, and handlers of de-icing agents within any watershed participate in training sessions in the proper application and control of road de-icing agents; that de-icing vehicles, wherever feasible, operating within the Scituate watershed area equipped with sensor devices to control the spread rate of de-icing materials in relation to the speed of the vehicle.

For purposes of this section the “Scituate watershed” shall mean the total drainage area into the Scituate Reservoir — an area of some 92.8 square miles in the towns of Scituate, Johnston, Foster, Glocester, and Smithfield — which because of its topography, soil type, and drainage patterns acts as a collector of rain waters which replenish or regorge existing public drinking water supplies in the Scituate Reservoir.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 846, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-26

; P.L. 1990, ch. 472, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 32.

24-8-27.
“Bridge” defined — Responsibility for smaller structures.

The word “bridge” as used in this chapter shall be any structure not less than five feet (5´) in width. Any structure less than five feet (5´) in width lying in any highway now being or hereafter becoming a part of the state highway system shall be constructed, repaired or reconstructed at the expense of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 846, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-27

.

24-8-28.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 24; P.L. 1926, ch. 786, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-28

; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 20, § 2, effective June 15, 2012.

24-8-29.
Succession of director to stone bridge commissioner.

Whenever the words “commissioner of the Rhode Island stone bridge” occur in any general law, public law, or resolution of the general assembly or are used in any document, record, instrument, or proceeding authorized by any such law or resolution relating to the commissioner of the Rhode Island stone bridge, the words shall be construed to mean the director of the department of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 786, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-29

.

24-8-30.
Red Bridge exempt.

Red Bridge, lying between Providence and East Providence, is excluded from the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 846, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 22; P.L. 1926, ch. 786, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-30

.

24-8-31.
Federal aid rights preserved.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be used or construed in any manner or in any way so as to prevent the state from receiving any kind or type of government or federal aid for the roads and bridges of the state from the United States government.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 97, § 32; P.L. 1935, ch. 2269, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 74, § 29; redesignated § 30 by P.L. 1949, ch. 2340, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-8-31

.

24-8-32.
Drainage of surface water.

Whenever any culvert, drain, or watercourse has been placed and maintained or has existed under or within a state highway for the purpose of disposing of surface water drainage, it shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to obstruct, block, or close any intake or outlet from the culvert, drain, or watercourse without first obtaining permission from the state department of transportation, which may grant the permits under the terms and conditions as are warranted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 204, § 1.

24-8-33.
Connection into drainage system.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to make any connection into a state road drainage system, or to drain or pump water onto the travelled surface of a state highway without first obtaining written permission from the director of the state department of transportation. The director of the department of transportation is empowered to make and file rules and regulations which prescribe the conditions under which the permission shall be granted. The director shall render a decision within ninety (90) days of receipt of the request for permission. Any person, firm, or corporation convicted of violating this section shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 401, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 200, § 1.

24-8-34.
Regulation of access.

The legislature recognizes the need for the director of the department of transportation to establish and maintain the safe condition and integrity of state roads. Accordingly, the director is authorized to regulate direct vehicle access to state roads in situations whereby access may reasonably tend to affect the safe condition and integrity of state roads. This includes the authority to regulate the type, location, and width of roadways and driveways at their intersection with state highways and the authority to regulate construction within state highway right-of-ways.

Requests for access must be made in writing to the director, the local planning board and the chief elected or appointed official in a city or town at the same time and in a manner prescribed by the director. The director shall promulgate rules and regulations which prescribe the conditions under which requests will be granted. These rules and regulations shall apply prospectively and shall be based on accepted engineering and construction standards.

The director may provide written notice and comments on the proposed access or alterations to the planning board and the chief elected or appointed official of the city or town in which the state highway is located for all commercial and residential physical alteration permit applications filed with the department and shall afford the planning board and the chief elected or appointed official of the city or town with the ability to provide written comments on the request.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 300, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 478, § 1.

24-8-35.
Damage caused by potholes — Claims against the state.

If any person shall incur damage to his or her motor vehicle by reason of a pothole on any state highway, causeway, or bridge which damage would not have occurred without the existence of the pothole, he or she may recover from the state the amount of damages sustained up to and not more than the sum of three hundred dollars ($300). All claims shall be made within a period of seven (7) days from the date on which the damage was sustained by filing a written report in a manner prescribed by the director of the department of transportation who shall in all instances make the final determination as to the merits of any claim so submitted. All claims approved by the director shall be paid in full within forty-five (45) days of the final approval. In no instance, however, shall any claim for damage so caused to a motor vehicle registered in a foreign state be considered unless that state has a similar statute affording similar protection to persons owning motor vehicles registered in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 7, § 1.

24-8-36.
Right to administrative appeal.

Any person, firm, or corporation aggrieved by a decision of the director pursuant to this chapter has the right to an appeal in accordance with the procedures contained within chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 80, § 2.

24-8-37.
Penalties.

Any person, firm, corporation, or municipality who violates any of the provisions of §§

24-8-32

—

24-8-34

may be enjoined upon a complaint filed by the director in superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 80, § 2.